Hawaii, session 2026, HB234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 235-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending subsection (a) to read: "(a)  There is hereby imposed on the taxable income of every: (1)  Taxpayer who files a joint return under section 235-93; and (2)  Surviving spouse, a tax determined in accordance with the following table: In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2017: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $4,800              1.40% of taxable income Over $4,800 but              $67.00 plus 3.20% of not over $9,600              excess over $4,800 Over $9,600 but              $221.00 plus 5.50% of not over $19,200             excess over $9,600 Over $19,200 but             $749.00 plus 6.40% of not over $28,800             excess over $19,200 Over $28,800 but             $1,363.00 plus 6.80% of not over $38,400             excess over $28,800 Over $38,400 but             $2,016.00 plus 7.20% of not over $48,000             excess over $38,400 Over $48,000 but             $2,707.00 plus 7.60% of not over $72,000             excess over $48,000 Over $72,000 but             $4,531.00 plus 7.90% of not over $96,000             excess over $72,000 Over $96,000 but             $6,427.00 plus 8.25% of not over $300,000             excess over $96,000 Over $300,000 but             $23,257.00 plus 9.00% of not over $350,000             excess over $300,000 Over $350,000 but             $27,757.00 plus 10.00% of not over $400,000             excess over $350,000 Over $400,000                $32,757.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $400,000. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2024: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $19,200             1.40% of taxable income Over $19,200 but             $269.00 plus 3.20% of not over $28,800             excess over $19,200 Over $28,800 but             $576.00 plus 5.50% of not over $38,400             excess over $28,800 Over $38,400 but             $1,104.00 plus 6.40% of not over $48,000             excess over $38,400 Over $48,000 but             $1,718.00 plus 6.80% of not over $72,000             excess over $48,000 Over $72,000 but             $3,350.00 plus 7.20% of not over $96,000             excess over $72,000 Over $96,000 but             $5,078.00 plus 7.60% of not over $250,000             excess over $96,000 Over $250,000 but             $16,782.00 plus 7.90% of not over $350,000             excess over $250,000 Over $350,000 but             $24,682.00 plus 8.25% of not over $450,000             excess over $350,000 Over $450,000 but             $32,932.00 plus 9.00% of not over $550,000             excess over $450,000 Over $550,000 but             $41,932.00 plus 10.00% of not over $650,000             excess over $550,000 Over $650,000                $51,932.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $650,000. [In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2026: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $28,800             1.40% of taxable income Over $28,800 but             $403.00 plus 3.20% of not over $38,400             excess over $28,800 Over $38,400 but             $710.00 plus 5.50% of not over $48,000             excess over $38,400 Over $48,000 but             $1,238.00 plus 6.40% of not over $72,000             excess over $48,000 Over $72,000 but             $2,774.00 plus 6.80% of not over $96,000             excess over $72,000 Over $96,000 but             $4,406.00 plus 7.20% of not over $250,000             excess over $96,000 Over $250,000 but             $15,494.00 plus 7.60% of not over $350,000             excess over $250,000 Over $350,000 but             $23,094.00 plus 7.90% of not over $450,000             excess over $350,000 Over $450,000 but             $30,994.00 plus 8.25% of not over $550,000             excess over $450,000 Over $550,000 but             $39,244.00 plus 9.00% of not over $650,000             excess over $550,000 Over $650,000 but             $48,244.00 plus 10.00% of not over $800,000             excess over $650,000 Over $800,000                $63,244.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $800,000. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2028: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $38,400             1.40% of taxable income Over $38,400 but             $538.00 plus 3.20% of not over $48,000             excess over $38,400 Over $48,000 but             $845.00 plus 5.50% of not over $72,000             excess over $48,000 Over $72,000 but             $2,165.00 plus 6.40% of not over $96,000             excess over $72,000 Over $96,000 but             $3,701.00 plus 6.80% of not over $250,000             excess over $96,000 Over $250,000 but             $14,173.00 plus 7.20% of not over $350,000             excess over $250,000 Over $350,000 but             $21,373.00 plus 7.60% of not over $450,000             excess over $350,000 Over $450,000 but             $28,973.00 plus 7.90% of not over $550,000             excess over $450,000 Over $550,000 but             $36,873.00 plus 8.25% of not over $650,000             excess over $550,000 Over $650,000 but             $45,123.00 plus 9.00% of not over $800,000             excess over $650,000 Over $800,000 but             $58,623.00 plus 10.00% of not over $950,000             excess over $800,000 Over $950,000                $73,623.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $950,000.] In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2025: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Over $200,000 but             7.90% of taxable income not over $250,000 Over $250,000 but             $3,950.00 plus 8.25% of not over $350,000             excess over $250,000 Over $350,000 but             $8,250.00 plus 9.00% of not over $450,000             excess over $350,000 Over $450,000 but             $9,000.00 plus 10.00% of not over $550,000             excess over $450,000 Over $550,000 but            $10,000.00 plus 11.00% of not over $650,000             excess over $550,000 Over $650,000                $11,000.00 plus 12.00% of excess over $650,000." 2. By amending subsection (c) to read: "(c)  There is hereby imposed on the taxable income of (1) every unmarried individual (other than a surviving spouse, or the head of a household) and (2) on the taxable income of every married individual who does not make a single return jointly with the individual's spouse under section 235-93 a tax determined in accordance with the following table: In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2017: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $2,400              1.40% of taxable income Over $2,400 but              $34.00 plus 3.20% of not over $4,800              excess over $2,400 Over $4,800 but              $110.00 plus 5.50% of not over $9,600              excess over $4,800 Over $9,600 but              $374.00 plus 6.40% of not over $14,400             excess over $9,600 Over $14,400 but             $682.00 plus 6.80% of not over $19,200             excess over $14,400 Over $19,200 but             $1,008.00 plus 7.20% of not over $24,000             excess over $19,200 Over $24,000 but             $1,354.00 plus 7.60% of not over $36,000             excess over $24,000 Over $36,000 but             $2,266.00 plus 7.90% of not over $48,000             excess over $36,000 Over $48,000 but             $3,214.00 plus 8.25% of not over $150,000             excess over $48,000 Over $150,000 but             $11,629.00 plus 9.00% of not over $175,000             excess over $150,000 Over $175,000 but             $13,879.00 plus 10.00% of not over $200,000             excess over $175,000 Over $200,000                $16,379.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $200,000. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2024: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $9,600              1.40% of taxable income Over $9,600 but              $134.00 plus 3.20% of not over $14,400             excess over $9,600 Over $14,400 but             $288.00 plus 5.50% of not over $19,200             excess over $14,400 Over $19,200 but             $552.00 plus 6.40% of not over $24,000             excess over $19,200 Over $24,000 but             $859.00 plus 6.80% of not over $36,000             excess over $24,000 Over $36,000 but             $1,675.00 plus 7.20% of not over $48,000             excess over $36,000 Over $48,000 but             $2,539.00 plus 7.60% of not over $125,000             excess over $48,000 Over $125,000 but             $8,391.00 plus 7.90% of not over $175,000             excess over $125,000 Over $175,000 but             $12,341.00 plus 8.25% of not over $225,000             excess over $175,000 Over $225,000 but             $16,466.00 plus 9.00% of not over $275,000             excess over $225,000 Over $275,000 but             $20,966.00 plus 10.00% of not over $325,000             excess over $275,000 Over $325,000                $25,966.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $325,000. [In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2026: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $14,400             1.40% of taxable income Over $14,400 but             $202.00 plus 3.20% of not over $19,200             excess over $14,400 Over $19,200 but             $355.00 plus 5.50% of not over $24,000             excess over $19,200 Over $24,000 but             $619.00 plus 6.40% of not over $36,000             excess over $24,000 Over $36,000 but             $1,387.00 plus 6.80% of not over $48,000             excess over $36,000 Over $48,000 but             $2,203.00 plus 7.20% of not over $125,000             excess over $48,000 Over $125,000 but             $7,747.00 plus 7.60% of not over $175,000             excess over $125,000 Over $175,000 but             $11,547.00 plus 7.90% of not over $225,000             excess over $175,000 Over $225,000 but             $15,497.00 plus 8.25% of not over $275,000             excess over $225,000 Over $275,000 but             $19,622.00 plus 9.00% of not over $325,000             excess over $275,000 Over $325,000 but             $24,122.00 plus 10.00% of not over $400,000             excess over $325,000 Over $400,000                $31,622.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $400,000. In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2028: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Not over $19,200             1.40% of taxable income Over $19,200 but             $269.00 plus 3.20% of not over $24,000             excess over $19,200 Over $24,000 but             $422.00 plus 5.50% of not over $36,000             excess over $24,000 Over $36,000 but             $1,082.00 plus 6.40% of not over $48,000             excess over $36,000 Over $48,000 but             $1,850.00 plus 6.80% of not over $125,000             excess over $48,000 Over $125,000 but             $7,086.00 plus 7.20% of not over $175,000             excess over $125,000 Over $175,000 but             $10,686.00 plus 7.60% of not over $225,000             excess over $175,000 Over $225,000 but             $14,486.00 plus 7.90% of not over $275,000             excess over $225,000 Over $275,000 but             $18,436.00 plus 8.25% of not over $325,000             excess over $275,000 Over $325,000 but             $22,561.00 plus 9.00% of not over $400,000             excess over $325,000 Over $400,000 but             $29,311.00 plus 10.00% of not over $475,000             excess over $400,000 Over $475,000                $36,811.00 plus 11.00% of excess over $475,000.] In the case of any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2025: If the taxable income is:     The tax shall be: Over $100,000 but             7.90% of taxable income not over $125,000 Over $125,000 but             $1,975.00 plus 8.25% of not over $175,000             excess over $125,000 Over $175,000 but             $4,125.00 plus 9.00% of not over $225,000             excess over $175,000 Over $225,000 but             $4,500.00 plus 10.00% of not over $275,000             excess over $225,000 Over $275,000 but             $5,000.00 plus 11.00% of not over $325,000             excess over $275,000 Over $325,000                $5,500.00 plus 12.00% of excess over $325,000." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act, upon its approval, shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________